Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4333.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 13k. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 333.2670 Person E Conduct pathogen enhancement engineering or research 5 333.2685 Person E Use of a live human embryo, fetus, or neonate for nontherapeutic research 5 333.2688 Person E Research on dead embryo, fetus, or neonate without mother's consent 5 333.2689 Person E Abortion to obtain embryo or fetus 5 333.2690(1) Person E Sale or delivery of fetus, embryo, or neonate for certain purposes 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 333.2690(2) Person E Financially benefiting from granting certain persons access to an embryo, fetus, or neonate or from transferring possession of an embryo, fetus, or neonate to certain persons 5 333.2813(3) Pub trst F Unauthorized disclosure of social security Social Security number ? subsequent offense 4 333.2841(3) Pub ord E Failure to inform law enforcement or funeral home of discovery of dead body with purpose of concealing fact or cause of death 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.5210(1) Person F Person who has HIV knowingly engaging in vaginal or anal intercourse with uninfected person without informing the person he or she has of HIV with the intent to infect that person with HIV 4 333.5210(2) Person F Person who has HIV knowingly engaging in vaginal or anal intercourse with uninfected person without informing the person he or she has of HIV with reckless disregard and resulting in the person contracting HIV 4 333.5661 Person F Fraud resulting in patient death 4 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02461'25) or House Bill No. 4332 (request no. H02461'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.